Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB458.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9543(a)(2) of Title 42 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a subparagraph to read:§ 9543. Eligibility for relief.(a) General rule.--To be eligible for relief under this subchapter, the petitioner must plead and prove by a preponderance of the evidence all of the following:* * *(2) That the conviction or sentence resulted from one or more of the following:1234567891011121314151617181920 * * *(ix) Failure to consider evidence that the petitioner has a service-connected mental health disability as defined in section 9543.2(g) (relating to postconviction review for veterans with service-connected mental health disability).* * *Section 2. Title 42 is amended by adding a section to read:§ 9543.2. Postconviction review for veterans with service-connected mental health disability.(a) Motion.--(1) An individual convicted of a criminal offense in a court of this Commonwealth and serving a term of imprisonment or awaiting execution because of a sentence of death may submit a written motion to the sentencing court for the performance or review of a mental health evaluation to determine whether the individual has a service-connected mental health disability.(2) The applicant shall ensure that all necessary forms authorizing the release of medical records have been completed as of the date of the motion.(b) Notice to the Commonwealth.--Upon receipt of a motion under subsection (a), the court shall notify the Commonwealth and shall afford the Commonwealth an opportunity to respond to the motion.(c) Requirements.--In a motion under subsection (a), the applicant shall:(1) In a capital case, assert that the outcome of the mental health evaluation will establish a mitigating circumstance under section 9711(e)(7.1) (relating to 20250HB0458PN0440 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree).(2) Present a prima facie case demonstrating that a mental health evaluation would establish that the applicant's service-connected mental health disability was a contributing factor in the applicant's conviction for the underlying offense.(d) Order.--(1) Except as provided in paragraph (2), the sentencing court shall order the performance or review of the mental health evaluation requested in a motion under subsection (a) upon a determination, after review of the record of the applicant's trial, that the:(i) requirements of subsection (c) have been met;(ii) applicant is a veteran who served in the United States Armed Forces in a combat zone or other similar hazardous duty area; and(iii) motion is not made to delay the execution of sentence or administration of justice.(2) The court shall not order the performance or review of the mental health evaluation requested in a motion under subsection (a) if, after review of the record of the applicant's trial, the court determines that there is no reasonable possibility that the evaluation would produce evidence that the individual has a service-connected mental health disability that may be a contributing factor in the applicant's conviction for the underlying offense.(3) Upon issuance of an order under paragraph (1), the president judge of the court of common pleas having jurisdiction shall assign the motion for postconviction relief for review to:20250HB0458PN0440 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (i) a veterans court; or(ii) a judge trained to review matters pertaining to veterans.(4) If the court orders the performance or review of the mental health evaluation requested in a motion under subsection (a), the Department of Military and Veterans Affairs may work with the United States Department of Veterans Affairs to ensure that the applicant has the opportunity to have a complete mental health evaluation performed or reviewed by a health care practitioner with expertise in service-connected mental health disabilities.(e) Mental health evaluation procedures.--(1) After the mental health evaluation conducted or reviewed under this section has been completed, the applicant may, in accordance with section 9545(b)(2) (relating to jurisdiction and proceedings), during a 60-day period beginning on the date on which the applicant is notified of the evaluation results, petition to the court under subsection (d)(3) for postconviction relief in accordance with section 9543(a)(2)(ix) (relating to eligibility for relief).(2) Upon receipt of a petition filed under paragraph (1), the court shall consider the petition along with any answer filed by the Commonwealth and conduct a hearing.(3) In a hearing on a petition for postconviction relief filed under paragraph (1), the court shall determine whether any evidence resulting from the mental health evaluation conducted or reviewed under this section would have reasonably altered the outcome of the trial or sentence.(4) If the mental health evaluation indicates that the 20250HB0458PN0440 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 petitioner has a service-connected mental health disability, the Commonwealth and the court shall take the steps reasonably necessary to ensure that the Department of Corrections is informed of the petitioner's disability status and ensure that the petitioner receives all the protections afforded to people with disabilities under 42 U.S.C. Ch. 126 (relating to equal opportunity for individuals with disabilities).(f) Effect of motion.--The filing of a motion for a mental health evaluation in accordance with subsection (a) shall have the following effect:(1) The filing of the motion shall constitute the applicant's consent to undergo a mental health evaluation.(2) The data from an evaluation obtained as a result of the motion may not be entered into law enforcement databases, may not be used in the investigation of other crimes and may not be used as evidence against the applicant in any manner.(g) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Applicant." An individual who submits a written motion to a sentencing court for the performance or review of a mental health evaluation to determine whether the individual has a service-connected mental health disability under subsection (a)(1)."Service-connected mental health disability." A mental health disorder incurred in the course of and as a result of active duty or training for active duty in the United States Armed Forces.Section 3. Section 9545(b)(1) of Title 42 is amended to 20250HB0458PN0440 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 read:§ 9545. Jurisdiction and proceedings.* * *(b) Time for filing petition.--(1) Any petition under this subchapter, including a second or subsequent petition, shall be filed within one year of the date the judgment becomes final, unless the petition alleges and the petitioner proves that:(i) the failure to raise the claim previously was the result of interference by government officials with the presentation of the claim in violation of the Constitution or laws of this Commonwealth or the Constitution or laws of the United States;(ii) the facts upon which the claim is predicated were unknown to the petitioner and could not have been ascertained by the exercise of due diligence; [or](iii) the right asserted is a constitutional right that was recognized by the Supreme Court of the United States or the Supreme Court of Pennsylvania after the time period provided in this section and has been held by that court to apply retroactively[.]; or(iv) the petitioner's diagnosis of a service- connected mental health disability, as defined in section 9543.2(g) (relating to postconviction review for veterans with service-connected mental health disability), was not considered by the court during the proceedings that resulted in the petitioner's conviction and sentencing.* * *Section 4. Section 9711(e) of Title 42 is amended by adding a paragraph to read:20250HB0458PN0440 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 § 9711. Sentencing procedure for murder of the first degree.* * *(e) Mitigating circumstances.--Mitigating circumstances shall include the following:* * *(7.1) The defendant has undergone a mental health evaluation and has been found to have a service-connected mental health disability as defined in section 9543.2(g) (relating to postconviction review for veterans with service-connected mental health disability).* * *Section 5. The Supreme Court shall have the power to adopt rules as deemed necessary to carry out the amendment or addition of 42 Pa.C.S. §§ 9543(a)(2)(ix), 9543.2, 9545(b)(1) and 9711(e)(7.1).Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0458PN0440 - 7 - 12345678910111213141516